New York, session 2025-2026, A10846.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 6512 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 644 of the laws of 1979, is amended and a new subdi- 3 vision 3 is added to read as follows: 4 1. Anyone not authorized to practice under this title who practices or 5 offers to practice or holds [himself] themselves out as being able to 6 practice in any profession in which a license is a prerequisite to the 7 practice of the acts, or who practices any profession as an exempt 8 person during the time when [his] their professional license is 9 suspended, revoked or annulled, or who aids or abets an unlicensed 10 person to practice a profession, or who fraudulently sells, files, 11 furnishes, obtains, or who attempts fraudulently to sell, file, furnish 12 or obtain any diploma, license, record or permit purporting to authorize 13 the practice of a profession, shall be guilty of a class E felony. 14 3. Neither the unauthorized or unlicensed practice of massage therapy 15 under article one hundred fifty-five of this title, nor the aiding or 16 abetting of unauthorized or unlicensed practice of massage therapy under 17 article one hundred fifty-five of this title, shall be a violation of 18 this section. 19 § 2. Section 6513 of the education law is amended by adding a new 20 subdivision 3 to read as follows: 21 3. Neither the unauthorized or unlicensed practice of massage therapy 22 under article one hundred fifty-five of this title, nor the aiding or 23 abetting of unauthorized or unlicensed practice of massage therapy under 24 article one hundred fifty-five of this title, shall be a violation of 25 this section. Neither the unauthorized or unlicensed use of the titles 26 "masseur," "masseuse," or "massage therapist" prohibited in section 27 seventy-eight hundred two of this title, nor the description, advertise- 28 ment, or placement of an advertisement of services defined in section EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08623-01-5 A. 10846 2 1 seventy-eight hundred one of this title where the services are performed 2 by someone unauthorized or unlicensed to practice such services, prohib- 3 ited by section seventy-eight hundred two of this title, shall be a 4 violation of this section. 5 § 3. Subdivision 2 of section 6514 of the education law, as amended by 6 chapter 257 of the laws of 1996, is amended to read as follows: 7 2. The attorney general shall prosecute such alleged offenses in the 8 name of the state[, provided, however, in the event of alleged 9 violations of article one hundred fifty-five of this title, a district 10 attorney may prosecute such alleged offenses in the name of the state 11 provided, however, that any district attorney may prosecute such 12 offenses where they are incidental to a criminal prosecution instituted 13 by him under other statutes]. 14 § 4. Section 6515 of the education law, as amended by chapter 615 of 15 the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 6515. Restraint of unlawful acts. Where a violation of this title is 17 alleged to have occurred, the attorney general[,] or the department [or, 18 in the event of alleged violations of article one hundred fifty-five of 19 this title occurring in cities having a population of one million or 20 more, the corporation counsel] may apply to the supreme court within the 21 judicial district in which such violation is alleged to have occurred 22 for an order enjoining or restraining commission or continuance of the 23 unlawful acts complained of. The remedy provided in this section shall 24 be in addition to any other remedy provided by law or to the proceedings 25 commenced against a licensee under this title. 26 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 6516 of the education law, as added by 27 chapter 615 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as follows: 28 3. Civil penalties. Civil penalties up to five thousand dollars may be 29 imposed for each violation of section sixty-five hundred twelve or 30 sixty-five hundred thirteen of this article and the respondent may be 31 ordered to make restitution to any person who has an interest in any 32 money or property, either real or personal, acquired by the respondent 33 as a result of a violation. Whenever the department concludes that civil 34 penalties and/or restitution may be warranted because of the egregious- 35 ness of the unlawful activity, it may serve, along with the cease and 36 desist order, a notice of a hearing on the allegations of unlawful 37 activity and the department's intention to order the respondent to make 38 restitution and/or impose a civil penalty. The notice should specify the 39 civil penalty sought for each violation. 40 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.